Georgia, session 2025_26, HB761.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 761
- 1 -

LC 47 3563/AP
SECTION 1.
An Act to provide a homestead exemption from all City of Lilburn ad valorem taxes for city
purposes, including but not limited to taxes to retire bonded indebtedness in the amount of
$5,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for certain residents of the City of Lilburn
and in the amount of $10,000.00 of the assessed value of the homestead for certain other
residents of the City of Lilburn who are 65 years of age or over or who are disabled,
approved March 22, 1990 (Ga. L. 1990, p. 4469), is amended by revising subsections (a) and
(b) of and adding a new subsection to Section 1 as follows:
"(a) Each resident of the City of Lilburn is granted an exemption on that person's
homestead from all City of Lilburn ad valorem taxes for any city purposes in an amount
equal to the amount by which the current year assessed value of the homestead exceeds the
prior year assessed value of such homestead by more than 8 percent and the amount of
$5,000.00 of the assessed value of that resident's homestead, as defined and qualified in
Code Section 48-5-40 of the O.C.G.A., except that land which is included in that
homestead and which exceeds one acre shall not have the value thereof exempt under this
subsection. Upon qualifying and receiving the homestead exemption provided for in
subsection (b) of this section, such resident shall cease to be qualified to receive the
homestead exemption provided for in this subsection.
(a.1) Each resident of the City of Lilburn who is 65 years of age or older is granted an
exemption on that person's homestead from City of Lilburn ad valorem taxes for city
purposes in the amount of $50,000.00 of the assessed value of that resident's homestead,
as defined and qualified in Code Section 48-5-40 of the O.C.G.A., except that land which
is not included in that homestead and which exceeds one acre shall not have the value
thereof exempt under this subsection.
(b) Each resident of the City of Lilburn who is disabled is granted an exemption on that
person's homestead from all City of Lilburn ad valorem taxes for any city purposes,
including but not limited to taxes to retire bond indebtedness, in the amount of $10,000.00
H. B. 761
- 2 -

LC 47 3563/AP
of the assessed value of that resident's homestead, as defined and qualified in Code Section
48-5-40 of the O.C.G.A., except that land which is not included in that homestead and
which exceeds one acre shall not have the value thereof exempt under this subsection."
SECTION 2.
In accordance with the requirements of Article VII, Section II of the Constitution of the State
of Georgia, this Act shall not become law unless it receives the requisite two-thirds' majority
vote in both the Senate and the House of Representatives.
SECTION 3.
The municipal election superintendent of the City of Lilburn shall call and conduct an
election as provided in this section for the purpose of submitting this Act to the electors of
the City of Lilburn for approval or rejection. The municipal election superintendent shall
conduct that election on the Tuesday following the first Monday in November, 2025, and
shall issue the call and conduct such election as provided by general law. The municipal
election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once
a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof in the official organ of
Gwinnett County. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:
"( ) YES Shall the Act be approved which provides an additional homestead
exemption from City of Lilburn ad valorem taxes for city purposes in an
( ) NO amount equal to the amount by which the current year assessed value
exceeds the prior year assessed value of such homestead by more than 8
percent and which increases the value of the exemption for residents 65
years of age or older from $10,000.00 to $50,000.00 of the assessed value
of the homestead?"
All persons desiring to vote for approval of the Act shall vote "Yes," and all persons desiring
to vote for rejection of the Act shall vote "No." If more than one-half of the votes cast on
H. B. 761
- 3 -

LC 47 3563/AP
such question are for approval of the Act, Section 1 of this Act shall become of full force and
effect on January 1, 2026. If the Act is not so approved or if the election is not conducted
as provided in this section, Section 1 of this Act shall not become effective, and this Act shall
be automatically repealed on the 365th calendar day following the election date provided for
in this section. The expense of such election shall be borne by the City of Lilburn. It shall
be the municipal election superintendent's duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary
of State. The provisions of this section shall be mandatory upon the municipal election
superintendent and are not intended as directory. If the municipal election superintendent
fails or refuses to comply with this section, any elector of the City of Lilburn may apply for
a writ of mandamus to compel the municipal election superintendent to perform his or her
duties under this section. If the court finds that the municipal election superintendent has not
complied with this section, the court shall fashion appropriate relief requiring the municipal
election superintendent to call and conduct such election on the date required by this section
or on the next date authorized for special elections provided for in Code Section 21-2-540
of the O.C.G.A.
SECTION 4.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 3 of this Act, this Act shall become effective upon
its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 761
- 4 -